lexc-files/dem-suffixes.txt
!===============
LEXICON DemAdvPB
!===============
0:0                              Enclitic;
^pi:^pi                          VerbPostbaseI; ! empty base pi- [Jacobson (1984), Woodbury (2004)]
^+kaghtagh(DEM→N):^kaghta%{g%}h  NounInflIII;   ! one from N
^+keghtagh(DEM→N):^keghta%{g%}h  NounInflIII;   ! one from N
^+ta(DEM→N):^ta                  NounInflI;     ! N area of possessor
^+tmiigh(DEM→V):^tmiigh          VerbInflIV;    ! to go in the N direction
^[All.Sg]:^tmun                  #;             ! second terminalis [Jacobson (2001) p.113]

^[Loc.Sg]:^m   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.Pl]:^n   VerbRootEte;
^[Loc.Du]:^gn  VerbRootEte;


!===============
LEXICON DemProSg
!===============

!----------------------------|
^[Rel.Sg]:^m         Enclitic;
^[Abl_Mod.Sg]:^meng  Enclitic;
^[Loc.Sg]:^mi        Enclitic;
^[All.Sg]:^mun       Enclitic:
^[Prl.Sg]:^kun       Enclitic;
^[Equ.Sg]:^tun       Enclitic;
!----------------------------|


!===============
LEXICON DemProPD
!===============

!----------------------------|--------------------------------|
^[AbsRel.Pl]:^t      Enclitic;  ^[AbsRel.Du]:^k       Enclitic;
^[Abl_Mod.Pl]:^neng  Enclitic;  ^[Abl_Mod.Du]:^gneng  Enclitic;
^[Loc.Pl]:^ni        Enclitic;  ^[Loc.Du]:^gni        Enclitic;
^[All.Pl]:^nun       Enclitic;  ^[All.Du]:^ginun      Enclitic;
^[Prl.Pl]:^tgun      Enclitic;  ^[Prl.Du]:^gnegun     Enclitic;
^[Equ.Pl]:^stun      Enclitic;  ^[Equ.Du]:^gestun     Enclitic;
!----------------------------|--------------------------------|
